Utah statutes.
63B-20-201.   Authorizations to design and construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $2,500,000 in donations to plan, design, and renovate the existing 8,800 square foot structure, and construct an addition to the Art Barn with up to 3,700 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(2)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $10,000,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Regional Campuses and Distance Education building, with up to 38,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(3)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $7,500,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct an Athletics Competition and Practice Facility, with up to 28,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(4)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Department of Natural Resources may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $2,300,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct the Lee Kay Archery Center, with up to 50,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the department may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

